Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7075.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that glucagon auto-injectors are life-saving
medications, that must be administered quickly to be effective. Such administration is often done
by persons who are not health care professionals, and is done in an emergency situation.
Accordingly, it is in the best interests of the people of the state to promote the widespread
availability of glucagon, that does not require reconstitution. Hypoglycemia, or low blood glucose,
is a barrier to diabetes control, leads to worse clinical outcomes, stress, increased cost of care and
polypharmacy. For unconscious patients, and those unable to ingest oral glucose, glucagon in the
ambulatory setting is indicated, but often underutilized, due to excessive cost.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Glucagon hypoglycemia medications.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of glucagon auto-injector,
nasal spray or formulation not requiring reconstitution. There shall be no copayment required and
no deductible shall need to be met, to obtain two (2) glucagon auto-injectors, nasal spray or non-
reconstituted formulation covered by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan

year. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with federally qualified health
savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan
from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Glucagon hypoglycemia medications.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of glucagon auto-injector,
nasal spray or formulation not requiring reconstitution. There shall be no copayment required and
no deductible shall need to be met, to obtain two (2) glucagon auto-injectors, nasal spray or non-
reconstituted formulation covered by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan
year. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with federally qualified health
savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan
from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Glucagon hypoglycemia medications.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of glucagon auto-injector,
nasal spray or formulation not requiring reconstitution. There shall be no copayment required and
no deductible shall need to be met, to obtain two (2) glucagon auto-injectors, nasal spray or non-
reconstituted formulation covered by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan
year. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with federally qualified health
savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan
from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Glucagon hypoglycemia medications.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of glucagon auto-injector,
nasal spray or formulation not requiring reconstitution. There shall be no copayment required and
LC003546 - Page 2 of 4

no deductible shall need to be met, to obtain two (2) glucagon auto-injectors, nasal spray or non-
reconstituted formulation covered by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan
year. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with federally qualified health
savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan
from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003546
========
LC003546 - Page 3 of 4